Louisiana, session 2026, HB269.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:192(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§192. Lunches and breakfasts; duty to furnish
* * *
C.(1)(a) There is hereby created within the state Department of Education
the Free School Breakfast Program.
(b) For each governing authority of a school nutrition program that meets the
requirements of the program as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, the
department shall provide funding for each reimbursable school breakfast that is
served to a student, up to one breakfast per student per school day. The
reimbursement amount for each governing authority shall be the difference between
the amount paid by the United States Department of Agriculture and the free rate as
set annually by the United States Secretary of Agriculture under 42 U.S.C. 1759a.
(c) The department may establish a payment schedule.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1027 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 269
(2) To receive funding from the department for the program, a governing
authority shall:
(a) Participate in the federal School Breakfast Program.
(b) Provide reimbursable breakfasts, pursuant to 7 CFR Part 210, at no cost
to all students each school day for any school breakfast program operated by the
governing authority.
(c) Maximize access to federal funds for the cost of school breakfast
programs by adopting the United States Department of Agriculture's Community
Eligibility Provision or any federal provision that results in the maximum possible
amount of federal funding for meals served in that program. Each governing
authority that has an identified student percentage greater than or equal to the
minimum requirement to be eligible to participate in the Community Eligibility
Provision shall participate in the subsequent school year and through the duration of
the Community Eligibility Provision's four-year cycle. To the extent practicable, the
governing authority shall group schools for purposes of maximizing the number of
schools eligible to participate in the Community Eligibility Provision.
(d) Maximize student participation, which may include providing breakfasts
that can be picked up, or making breakfasts available in classrooms after the start of
the school day.
(3) The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
promulgate rules as necessary for the implementation of this Subsection.
(4) The department shall convene a group of stakeholders to examine the
potential impact of offering statewide free school meals through other state funded
programs.
(5) The implementation of the provisions of this Subsection is subject to the
appropriation of funds by the legislature.
(6) For the purposes of this Subsection, the following terms have the
following meanings:
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1027 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 269
(a) "Community Eligibility Provision" means the federal provision created
by 42 U.S.C. Section 1759a, which allows school districts to choose to receive
federal special assistance payments for school meals in exchange for providing free
school meals to all students enrolled.
(b) "Identified student percentage" means the percentage of a school food
authority's student enrollment that is certified as eligible for free meals based on
documentation of benefit of receipt or categorical eligibility pursuant to 7 CFR Part
245.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be initially implemented at the beginning
of the 2026-2027 school year subject to R.S. 17:192(C)(5) as enacted by this Act.